Utah statutes.
17-35b-304.    Consolidated city and county -- Structural form.

(1)  The structural form of county government known as the "consolidated city and county" form unites in a single consolidated city and county government the powers, duties, and functions which, immediately prior to its effective date, are vested in the county, the largest city in the county, such other cities and towns as elect to merge in it, and all special taxing districts, public authorities, county service areas, and other local public entities functioning within the boundaries of the county, except school districts. The consolidated government shall with the consent of the continuing municipalities have power to extend on a countywide basis any governmental service or function which is authorized by law or which the previous county, cities, and other local public agencies included in them were empowered to provide for their residents. No such service, however, shall be provided within an incorporated municipality which continues to provide that such service for its own inhabitants, except upon a contract basis for the municipality. No taxes, assessments, fees, or other charges shall be extended or collected by the consolidated government within any municipality for the purpose of financing any service which is not provided by the consolidated government within the municipality. "Largest city," as used in this section, means a city or cities the population of which, as shown by the most recent decennial or special census, exceeds 35% of the total county population.

(2)  The incorporated cities and towns, other than the largest city in the county, shall retain independent corporate existence and shall continue to provide local services to their inhabitants of the type and to the extent provided in the plan; but any such city or town by majority vote of its qualified voters cast either concurrently with the election at which the plan is approved or subsequently to it, as provided by the governing body of the city or town, may cause the city or town to be dissolved and its powers, duties, and functions vested in the consolidated government.

(3)  The governing body of the consolidated government shall be a council composed of not less than five persons elected as specified in the plan. In addition to other powers vested in the consolidated government by law or pursuant to this act, the county council shall have all the legislative and policymaking powers which it is possible for the governing body of a county or a city to possess and which are not expressly denied by the constitution, by general law applicable to all cities or all counties, or by a specific restriction in the plan itself.

(4)  Except as provided in this act, the qualifications, mode of election, term of office, method of removal, procedure to fill vacancies, compensation, or other appropriate provisions relating to membership on the county council shall be provided in the plan.

(5)  Upon the effective date of the plan, as provided in it, all properties and assets, whether tangible or intangible, and all obligations, debts, and liabilities of those governmental entities which are merged into the consolidated government shall become vested and transferred by operation of law in and to the consolidated government. The properties, assets, obligations, debts, and liabilities of any city or town not merged into the consolidated government, so far as allocated, used, or incurred primarily to discharge a function which under the plan will no longer be a responsibility of the city or town, shall likewise be vested in and transferred to the consolidated government. All transfers under this Subsection (5) shall be subject to equitable adjustments, conditions, and limitations provided in the plan and determined by procedures specified in the plan, but the contractual rights of any bondholder or creditor shall not be impaired.

(6)  Upon the effective date of the plan, and as provided in it, nonelective officers and employees of the governmental entities which are merged into the consolidated government and such officers and employees of nonmerged cities or towns whose qualifications and duties relate primarily to functions which under the plan will no longer be a responsibility of those cities or towns shall be blanketed in and transferred to the consolidated government as officers and employees of it. Standards and procedures relating to such personnel transfers and for resolving disputes or grievances relating to them shall be provided in the plan.

